Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Medicaid.
§ 43-13-117.1.
Nursing facility services funds for certain nursing facility residents may be transferred to cover costs of services available through home- and community-based waiver programs.

It is the intent of the Legislature to expand access to Medicaid-funded home- and community-based services for eligible nursing facility residents who choose those services. The Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid is authorized to transfer funds allocated for nursing facility services for eligible residents to cover the cost of services available through the Independent Living Waiver, the Traumatic Brain Injury/Spinal Cord Injury Waiver, the Elderly and Disabled Waiver, and the Assisted Living Waiver programs when eligible residents choose those community services. The amount of funding transferred by the division shall be sufficient to cover the cost of home- and community-based waiver services for each eligible nursing facility residents who choose those services. The number of nursing facility residents who return to the community and home- and community-based waiver services shall not count against the total number of waiver slots for which the Legislature appropriates funding each year. Any funds remaining in the program when a former nursing facility resident ceases to participate in a home- and community-based waiver program under this provision shall be returned to nursing facility funding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 553, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 43-13-117.2.
Study on implementation of pilot program to provide chronic disease management of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.

The Division of Medicaid is authorized and directed to study the feasibility of implementing a pilot program to provide chronic disease management of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) using private sources of funding in an effort to reduce the financial and clinical burden of COPD illness upon the Medicaid program and the citizens of Mississippi. If a pilot program is deemed feasible, such a program shall be implemented and a report of findings and recommendations be prepared and provided to the Office of the Governor and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Public Health and Welfare Committees and the Chairman of the House Medicaid Committee in order to evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program in reducing costs within the Medicaid program and in providing improved health and well-being of the affected patients.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 553, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 43-13-117.3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2015, ch. 473, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 43-13-117.4.
Payment by Division of Medicaid of costs of care and services rendered by an entity that performs nontherapeutic abortions or maintains or operates or is affiliated with an entity that maintains or operates a facility where nontherapeutic abortions are performed prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Section 43-13-117, the division shall not authorize payment of part or all of the costs of care and services rendered by any entity that performs nontherapeutic abortions, maintains or operates a facility where nontherapeutic abortions are performed, or is affiliated with such an entity. For purposes of this provision, “nontherapeutic abortions” means abortions that are not qualified for federal matching funds under the Medicaid program, 42 USC Section 1396 et seq., and as amended hereafter, and “affiliated with” means having a legal relationship with another entity created or governed by one or more written instruments that demonstrates common control, ownership, franchisee status or management, or that grants a license or other authority to utilize the other entity’s brand name, trademark, service mark or other registered identification mark.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 469, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-13-117.5.
Reimbursement for services provided eligible beneficiaries by licensed freestanding psychiatric hospital authorized.

The Division of Medicaid is authorized to reimburse for services provided to eligible Medicaid beneficiaries by a licensed freestanding psychiatric hospital in a method and manner to be determined by the division in accordance with federal law and federal regulations. The division may seek any necessary waivers, make any required amendments to its State Plan, or revise any contracts authorized under Section 43-13-117(H) as necessary to provide the services authorized under this section. As used in this section, the term “psychiatric hospital” shall have the meaning as defined in Section 41-7-173(h)(ii), which is an institution that is primarily engaged in providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of a physician, psychiatric services for the diagnosis and treatment of persons with mental illness. It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost of providing services to individuals in a psychiatric hospital shall not exceed the cost of providing the same services to individuals in a hospital as defined by Section 41-7-173(h)(i).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 2019).

§ 43-13-118.
Records of provider participating in Medicaid program.

It shall be the duty of each provider participating in the medical assistance program to keep and maintain books, documents, and other records as prescribed by the division of Medicaid in substantiation of its claim for services rendered Medicaid recipients, and such books, documents, and other records shall be kept and maintained for a period of five (5) years or for whatever longer period as may be required or prescribed under federal or state statutes and shall be subject to audit by the division. The division shall be entitled to full recoupment of the amount it has paid any provider of medical service who has failed to keep or maintain records as required herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 336, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 49; Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-13-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2016.

§43-13-119. [Laws, 2006, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 498, § 3; Laws, 2013, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.]

§ 43-13-120.
Division of Medicaid deemed beneficiary of certain recipients who die intestate and without heirs.

Any person who is a Medicaid recipient and is receiving medical assistance for services provided in a long-term care facility under the provisions of Section 43-13-117 from the Division of Medicaid in the Office of the Governor, who dies intestate and leaves no known heirs, shall have deemed, through his acceptance of such medical assistance, the Division of Medicaid as his beneficiary to all such funds in an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) which are in his possession at the time of his death. Such funds, together with any accrued interest thereon, shall be reported by the long-term care facility to the State Treasurer in the manner provided in subsection (2).

The report of such funds shall be verified, shall be on a form prescribed or approved by the Treasurer, and shall include (a) the name of the deceased person and his last known address prior to entering the long-term care facility; (b) the name and last known address of each person who may possess an interest in such funds; and (c) any other information which the Treasurer prescribes by regulation as necessary for the administration of this section. The report shall be filed with the Treasurer prior to November 1 of each year in which the long-term care facility has provided services to a person or persons having funds to which this section applies.

Within one hundred twenty (120) days from November 1 of each year in which a report is made pursuant to subsection (2), the Treasurer shall cause notice to be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county of this state in which is located the last known address of the person or persons named in the report who may possess an interest in such funds, or if no such person is named in the report, in the county in which is located the last known address of the deceased person prior to entering the long-term care facility. If no address is given in the report or if the address is outside of this state, the notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the facility is located. The notice shall contain (a) the name of the deceased person; (b) his last known address prior to entering the facility; (c) the name and last known address of each person named in the report who may possess an interest in such funds; and (d) a statement that any person possessing an interest in such funds must make a claim therefor to the Treasurer within ninety (90) days after such publication date or the funds will become the property of the State of Mississippi. In any year in which the Treasurer publishes a notice of abandoned property under Section 89-12-27, the Treasurer may combine the notice required by this section with the notice of abandoned property. The cost to the Treasurer of publishing the notice required by this section shall be paid by the Division of Medicaid.

Each long-term care facility that makes a report of funds of a deceased person under this section shall pay over and deliver such funds, together with any accrued interest thereon, to the Treasurer not later than ten (10) days after notice of such funds has been published by the Treasurer as provided in subsection (3). If a claim to such funds is not made by any person having an interest therein within ninety (90) days of the published notice, the Treasurer shall place such funds in the special account in the State Treasury to the credit of the “Governor’s Office – Division of Medicaid” to be expended by the Division of Medicaid for the purposes provided under Mississippi Medicaid Law.

This section shall not be applicable to any Medicaid patient in a long-term care facility of a state institution listed in Section 41-7-73, who has a personal deposit fund as provided for in Section 41-7-90.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 403, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 437, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 43-13-121.
Authority to administer article.

The division shall administer the Medicaid program under the provisions of this article, and may do the following:

Adopt and promulgate reasonable rules, regulations and standards, with approval of the Governor, and in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law, Section 25-43-1.101 et seq.:

Establishing methods and procedures as may be necessary for the proper and efficient administration of this article;

Providing Medicaid to all qualified recipients under the provisions of this article as the division may determine and within the limits of appropriated funds;

Establishing reasonable fees, charges and rates for medical services and drugs; in doing so, the division shall fix all of those fees, charges and rates at the minimum levels absolutely necessary to provide the medical assistance authorized by this article, and shall not change any of those fees, charges or rates except as may be authorized in Section 43-13-117;

Providing for fair and impartial hearings;

Providing safeguards for preserving the confidentiality of records; and

For detecting and processing fraudulent practices and abuses of the program;

Receive and expend state, federal and other funds in accordance with court judgments or settlements and agreements between the State of Mississippi and the federal government, the rules and regulations promulgated by the division, with the approval of the Governor, and within the limitations and restrictions of this article and within the limits of funds available for that purpose;

Subject to the limits imposed by this article, to submit a Medicaid plan to the United States Department of Health and Human Services for approval under the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, to act for the state in making negotiations relative to the submission and approval of that plan, to make such arrangements, not inconsistent with the law, as may be required by or under federal law to obtain and retain that approval and to secure for the state the benefits of the provisions of that law.

No agreements, specifically including the general plan for the operation of the Medicaid program in this state, shall be made by and between the division and the United States Department of Health and Human Services unless the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi has reviewed the agreements, specifically including the operational plan, and has certified in writing to the Governor and to the executive director of the division that the agreements, including the plan of operation, have been drawn strictly in accordance with the terms and requirements of this article;

In accordance with the purposes and intent of this article and in compliance with its provisions, provide for aged persons otherwise eligible for the benefits provided under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act by expenditure of funds available for those purposes;

To make reports to the United States Department of Health and Human Services as from time to time may be required by that federal department and to the Mississippi Legislature as provided in this section;

Define and determine the scope, duration and amount of Medicaid that may be provided in accordance with this article and establish priorities therefor in conformity with this article;

Cooperate and contract with other state agencies for the purpose of coordinating Medicaid provided under this article and eliminating duplication and inefficiency in the Medicaid program;

Adopt and use an official seal of the division;

Sue in its own name on behalf of the State of Mississippi and employ legal counsel on a contingency basis with the approval of the Attorney General;

To recover any and all payments incorrectly made by the division to a recipient or provider from the recipient or provider receiving the payments. The division shall be authorized to collect any overpayments to providers sixty (60) days after the conclusion of any administrative appeal unless the matter is appealed to a court of proper jurisdiction and bond is posted. Any appeal filed after July 1, 2015, shall be to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, within sixty (60) days after the date that the division has notified the provider by certified mail sent to the proper address of the provider on file with the division and the provider has signed for the certified mail notice, or sixty (60) days after the date of the final decision if the provider does not sign for the certified mail notice. To recover those payments, the division may use the following methods, in addition to any other methods available to the division:

The division shall report to the Department of Revenue the name of any current or former Medicaid recipient who has received medical services rendered during a period of established Medicaid ineligibility and who has not reimbursed the division for the related medical service payment(s). The Department of Revenue shall withhold from the state tax refund of the individual, and pay to the division, the amount of the payment(s) for medical services rendered to the ineligible individual that have not been reimbursed to the division for the related medical service payment(s).

The division shall report to the Department of Revenue the name of any Medicaid provider to whom payments were incorrectly made that the division has not been able to recover by other methods available to the division. The Department of Revenue shall withhold from the state tax refund of the provider, and pay to the division, the amount of the payments that were incorrectly made to the provider that have not been recovered by other available methods;

To recover any and all payments by the division fraudulently obtained by a recipient or provider. Additionally, if recovery of any payments fraudulently obtained by a recipient or provider is made in any court, then, upon motion of the Governor, the judge of the court may award twice the payments recovered as damages;

Have full, complete and plenary power and authority to conduct such investigations as it may deem necessary and requisite of alleged or suspected violations or abuses of the provisions of this article or of the regulations adopted under this article, including, but not limited to, fraudulent or unlawful act or deed by applicants for Medicaid or other benefits, or payments made to any person, firm or corporation under the terms, conditions and authority of this article, to suspend or disqualify any provider of services, applicant or recipient for gross abuse, fraudulent or unlawful acts for such periods, including permanently, and under such conditions as the division deems proper and just, including the imposition of a legal rate of interest on the amount improperly or incorrectly paid. Recipients who are found to have misused or abused Medicaid benefits may be locked into one (1) physician and/or one (1) pharmacy of the recipient’s choice for a reasonable amount of time in order to educate and promote appropriate use of medical services, in accordance with federal regulations. If an administrative hearing becomes necessary, the division may, if the provider does not succeed in his or her defense, tax the costs of the administrative hearing, including the costs of the court reporter or stenographer and transcript, to the provider. The convictions of a recipient or a provider in a state or federal court for abuse, fraudulent or unlawful acts under this chapter shall constitute an automatic disqualification of the recipient or automatic disqualification of the provider from participation under the Medicaid program.

A conviction, for the purposes of this chapter, shall include a judgment entered on a plea of nolo contendere or a nonadjudicated guilty plea and shall have the same force as a judgment entered pursuant to a guilty plea or a conviction following trial. A certified copy of the judgment of the court of competent jurisdiction of the conviction shall constitute prima facie evidence of the conviction for disqualification purposes;

Establish and provide such methods of administration as may be necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the Medicaid program, fully utilizing computer equipment as may be necessary to oversee and control all current expenditures for purposes of this article, and to closely monitor and supervise all recipient payments and vendors rendering services under this article. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the division is authorized to enter into a ten-year contract(s) with a vendor(s) to provide services described in this paragraph (m). Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the division is authorized to extend its Medicaid Management Information Systems, including all related components and services, and Decision Support System, including all related components and services, contracts expiring on June 30, 2015, for a period not to exceed five (5) years without complying with the requirements provided in Section 25-9-120 and the Personal Service Contract Review Board procurement regulations;

To cooperate and contract with the federal government for the purpose of providing Medicaid to Vietnamese and Cambodian refugees, under the provisions of Public Law 94-23 and Public Law 94-24, including any amendments to those laws, only to the extent that the Medicaid assistance and the administrative cost related thereto are one hundred percent (100%) reimbursable by the federal government. For the purposes of Section 43-13-117, persons receiving Medicaid under Public Law 94-23 and Public Law 94-24, including any amendments to those laws, shall not be considered a new group or category of recipient; and

The division shall impose penalties upon Medicaid only, Title XIX participating long-term care facilities found to be in noncompliance with division and certification standards in accordance with federal and state regulations, including interest at the same rate calculated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and/or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) under federal regulations.

The division also shall exercise such additional powers and perform such other duties as may be conferred upon the division by act of the Legislature.

The division, and the State Department of Health as the agency for licensure of health care facilities and certification and inspection for the Medicaid and/or Medicare programs, shall contract for or otherwise provide for the consolidation of on-site inspections of health care facilities that are necessitated by the respective programs and functions of the division and the department.

The division and its hearing officers shall have power to preserve and enforce order during hearings; to issue subpoenas for, to administer oaths to and to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the production of books, papers, documents and other evidence, or the taking of depositions before any designated individual competent to administer oaths; to examine witnesses; and to do all things conformable to law that may be necessary to enable them effectively to discharge the duties of their office. In compelling the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the production of books, papers, documents and other evidence, or the taking of depositions, as authorized by this section, the division or its hearing officers may designate an individual employed by the division or some other suitable person to execute and return that process, whose action in executing and returning that process shall be as lawful as if done by the sheriff or some other proper officer authorized to execute and return process in the county where the witness may reside. In carrying out the investigatory powers under the provisions of this article, the executive director or other designated person or persons may examine, obtain, copy or reproduce the books, papers, documents, medical charts, prescriptions and other records relating to medical care and services furnished by the provider to a recipient or designated recipients of Medicaid services under investigation. In the absence of the voluntary submission of the books, papers, documents, medical charts, prescriptions and other records, the Governor, the executive director, or other designated person may issue and serve subpoenas instantly upon the provider, his or her agent, servant or employee for the production of the books, papers, documents, medical charts, prescriptions or other records during an audit or investigation of the provider. If any provider or his or her agent, servant or employee refuses to produce the records after being duly subpoenaed, the executive director may certify those facts and institute contempt proceedings in the manner, time and place as authorized by law for administrative proceedings. As an additional remedy, the division may recover all amounts paid to the provider covering the period of the audit or investigation, inclusive of a legal rate of interest and a reasonable attorney’s fee and costs of court if suit becomes necessary. Division staff shall have immediate access to the provider’s physical location, facilities, records, documents, books, and any other records relating to medical care and services rendered to recipients during regular business hours.

If any person in proceedings before the division disobeys or resists any lawful order or process, or misbehaves during a hearing or so near the place thereof as to obstruct the hearing, or neglects to produce, after having been ordered to do so, any pertinent book, paper or document, or refuses to appear after having been subpoenaed, or upon appearing refuses to take the oath as a witness, or after having taken the oath refuses to be examined according to law, the executive director shall certify the facts to any court having jurisdiction in the place in which it is sitting, and the court shall thereupon, in a summary manner, hear the evidence as to the acts complained of, and if the evidence so warrants, punish that person in the same manner and to the same extent as for a contempt committed before the court, or commit that person upon the same condition as if the doing of the forbidden act had occurred with reference to the process of, or in the presence of, the court.

In suspending or terminating any provider from participation in the Medicaid program, the division shall preclude the provider from submitting claims for payment, either personally or through any clinic, group, corporation or other association to the division or its fiscal agents for any services or supplies provided under the Medicaid program except for those services or supplies provided before the suspension or termination. No clinic, group, corporation or other association that is a provider of services shall submit claims for payment to the division or its fiscal agents for any services or supplies provided by a person within that organization who has been suspended or terminated from participation in the Medicaid program except for those services or supplies provided before the suspension or termination. When this provision is violated by a provider of services that is a clinic, group, corporation or other association, the division may suspend or terminate that organization from participation. Suspension may be applied by the division to all known affiliates of a provider, provided that each decision to include an affiliate is made on a case-by-case basis after giving due regard to all relevant facts and circumstances. The violation, failure or inadequacy of performance may be imputed to a person with whom the provider is affiliated where that conduct was accomplished within the course of his or her official duty or was effectuated by him or her with the knowledge or approval of that person.

The division may deny or revoke enrollment in the Medicaid program to a provider if any of the following are found to be applicable to the provider, his or her agent, a managing employee or any person having an ownership interest equal to five percent (5%) or greater in the provider:

Failure to truthfully or fully disclose any and all information required, or the concealment of any and all information required, on a claim, a provider application or a provider agreement, or the making of a false or misleading statement to the division relative to the Medicaid program.

Previous or current exclusion, suspension, termination from or the involuntary withdrawing from participation in the Medicaid program, any other state’s Medicaid program, Medicare or any other public or private health or health insurance program. If the division ascertains that a provider has been convicted of a felony under federal or state law for an offense that the division determines is detrimental to the best interest of the program or of Medicaid beneficiaries, the division may refuse to enter into an agreement with that provider, or may terminate or refuse to renew an existing agreement.

Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to the delivery of any goods, services or supplies, including the performance of management or administrative services relating to the delivery of the goods, services or supplies, under the Medicaid program, any other state’s Medicaid program, Medicare or any other public or private health or health insurance program.

Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to the neglect or abuse of a patient in connection with the delivery of any goods, services or supplies.

Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to the unlawful manufacture, distribution, prescription or dispensing of a controlled substance.

Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to fraud, theft, embezzlement, breach of fiduciary responsibility or other financial misconduct.

Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense punishable by imprisonment of a year or more that involves moral turpitude, or acts against the elderly, children or infirm.

Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense in connection with the interference or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense listed in paragraphs (c) through (i) of this subsection.

Sanction for a violation of federal or state laws or rules relative to the Medicaid program, any other state’s Medicaid program, Medicare or any other public health care or health insurance program.

Revocation of license or certification.

Failure to pay recovery properly assessed or pursuant to an approved repayment schedule under the Medicaid program.

Failure to meet any condition of enrollment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-41; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 11; Laws, 1976, ch. 317, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 336 § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 50; Laws, 1986, ch. 437, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 614, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 594, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 636B, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 530, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 488, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 473, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-13-122.
Division authorized to apply for federal, private and public waivers, grants and contributions; implementation of integrated case-mix payment and quality monitoring system.

The division is authorize to apply to the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services for waivers and research and demonstration grants.

The division is further authorized to accept and expend any grants, donations or contributions from any public or private organization together with any additional federal matching funds that may accrue and including, but not limited to, one hundred percent (100%) federal grant funds or funds from any governmental entity or instrumentality thereof in furthering the purposes and objectives of the Mississippi Medicaid program, provided that such receipts and expenditures are reported and otherwise handled in accordance with the General Fund Stabilization Act. The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer monies to the division from special funds in the State Treasury in amounts not exceeding the amounts authorized in the appropriation to the division.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 527, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 548, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 612, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 609, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 614, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 518, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 10; Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 2003.).

§ 43-13-123.
Methods of providing for payment of claims.

The determination of the method of providing payment of claims under this article shall be made by the division, with approval of the Governor, which methods may be:

By contract with insurance companies licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi or with nonprofit hospital service corporations, medical or dental service corporations, authorized to do business in Mississippi to underwrite on an insured premium approach, such medical assistance benefits as may be available, and any carrier selected under the provisions of this article is expressly authorized and empowered to undertake the performance of the requirements of that contract.

By contract with an insurance company licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi or with nonprofit hospital service, medical or dental service organizations, or other organizations including data processing companies, authorized to do business in Mississippi to act as fiscal agent.

The division shall obtain services to be provided under either of the above-described provisions in accordance with the Personal Service Contract Review Board Procurement Regulations.

The authorization of the foregoing methods shall not preclude other methods of providing payment of claims through direct operation of the program by the state or its agencies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-42; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 12; Laws, 1978, ch. 489, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 51; Laws, 2002, ch. 636B, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 12, 2002.).

§ 43-13-125.
Recovery of Medicaid payments from third parties; compromise or settlement of claims; plaintiff’s recovery of medical expenses as special damages; disposition of funds received.

If Medicaid is provided to a recipient under this article for injuries, disease or sickness caused under circumstances creating a cause of action in favor of the recipient against any person, firm, corporation, political subdivision or other state agency, then the division shall be entitled to recover the proceeds that may result from the exercise of any rights of recovery that the recipient may have against any such person, firm, corporation, political subdivision or other state agency, to the extent of the Division of Medicaid’s interest on behalf of the recipient.The recipient shall execute and deliver instruments and papers to do whatever is necessary to secure those rights and shall do nothing after Medicaid is provided to prejudice the subrogation rights of the division.Court orders or agreements for reimbursement of Medicaid’s interest shall direct those payments to the Division of Medicaid, which shall be authorized to endorse any and all, including, but not limited to, multipayee checks, drafts, money orders, or other negotiable instruments representing Medicaid payment recoveries that are received. In accordance with Section 43-13-305, endorsement of multipayee checks, drafts, money orders or other negotiable instruments by the Division of Medicaid shall be deemed endorsed by the recipient.All payments must be remitted to the division within sixty (60) days from the date of a settlement or the entry of a final judgment; failure to do so hereby authorizes the division to assert its rights under Sections 43-13-307 and 43-13-315, plus interest.

The division, with the approval of the Governor, may compromise or settle any such claim and execute a release of any claim it has by virtue of this section at the division’s sole discretion.Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Division of Medicaid to compromise any such claim.

The acceptance of Medicaid under this article or the making of a claim under this article shall not affect the right of a recipient or his or her legal representative to recover Medicaid’s interest as an element of damages in any action at law; however, a copy of the pleadings shall be certified to the division at the time of the institution of suit, and proof of that notice shall be filed of record in that action. The division may, at any time before the trial on the facts, join in that action or may intervene in that action. Any amount recovered by a recipient or his or her legal representative shall be applied as follows:

The reasonable costs of the collection, including attorney’s fees, as approved and allowed by the court in which that action is pending, or in case of settlement without suit, by the legal representative of the division;

The amount of Medicaid’s interest on behalf of the recipient; or such amount as may be arrived at by the legal representative of the division and the recipient’s attorney; and

Any excess shall be awarded to the recipient.

No compromise of any claim by the recipient or his or her legal representative shall be binding upon or affect the rights of the division against the third party unless the division, with the approval of the Governor, has entered into the compromise in writing. The recipient or his or her legal representative maintain the absolute duty to notify the division of the institution of legal proceedings, and the third party and his or her insurer maintain the absolute duty to notify the division of a proposed compromise for which the division has an interest. The aforementioned absolute duties may not be delegated or assigned by contract or otherwise. Any compromise effected by the recipient or his or her legal representative with the third party in the absence of advance notification to and approved by the division shall constitute conclusive evidence of the liability of the third party, and the division, in litigating its claim against the third party, shall be required only to prove the amount and correctness of its claim relating to the injury, disease or sickness. If the recipient or his or her legal representative fails to notify the division of the institution of legal proceedings against a third party for which the division has a cause of action, the facts relating to negligence and the liability of the third party, if judgment is rendered for the recipient, shall constitute conclusive evidence of liability in a subsequent action maintained by the division and only the amount and correctness of the division’s claim relating to injuries, disease or sickness shall be tried before the court. The division shall be authorized in bringing that action against the third party and his or her insurer jointly or against the insurer alone.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or otherwise restrict the subrogation rights of the Division of Medicaid against a third party for Medicaid provided by the Division of Medicaid to the recipient as a result of injuries, disease or sickness caused under circumstances creating a cause of action in favor of the recipient against such a third party.

Any amounts recovered by the division under this section shall, by the division, be placed to the credit of the funds appropriated for benefits under this article proportionate to the amounts provided by the state and federal governments respectively.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-43; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 13; Laws, 1979, ch. 326; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 52; Laws, 1993, ch. 609, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 11; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 5; Laws, 2014, ch. 488, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.